Massachusetts, session 194th, H2465.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 23A of chapter 112 of the General Laws is hereby amended by
striking out the words “and who limits his practice to schools, teams or organizations with whom
he is associated” from the definition of "Athletic Trainer."
SECTION 2. The Board of Allied Health Professions must review and update the rules
and regulations pursuant to this act within 180 days of the passage of this act.
SECTION 3. Section 54A of chapter 71 of the general laws, as appearing in the 2022
Official Edition, is hereby amended by inserting after the words “eleven C“, in line 3, the
following words:- or a licensed athletic trainer, who have completed the annual head injury
safety training, as required by 105 CMR 201.007.
SECTION 4. Section 8A (b)(7) of chapter 69 is hereby amended by inserting the word
“athletic” after “coaches” and before “trainers”. Section 8A (c) of chapter 69 is hereby amended
by inserting the word “athletic” after “coaches” and before “trainers”.
of 1